California statutes. Public Contract Code
-------------------------------------------

10112.2.

(a) The Construction Manager/General Contractor method provided by this article may be used by the department, but is not limited to, when it is anticipated that the method will reduce project costs or expedite project completion in a manner that is not achievable through the design-bid-build method. Notwithstanding any other law, for projects utilizing the Construction Manager/General Contractor method provided by this article, the department shall advertise, award, and administer the Construction Manager/General Contractor contract.

(b) On all projects delivered by the department utilizing the Construction Manager/General Contractor method provided by this
 article, the department shall use department employees or consultants under contract with the department to perform all project design and engineering services related to design required for Construction Manager/General Contractor project delivery consistent with Article XXII of the California Constitution. On all projects delivered by the department, the department shall use department employees or consultants under contract with the department to perform all construction inspection services required for Construction Manager/General Contractor project delivery consistent with Article XXII of the California Constitution.

(c) The Construction Manager/General Contractor method referenced in this article shall not include the authority to perform construction inspection services for water resources projects authorized by this article,
 except as provided by Section 148 of the Water Code.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the department shall not utilize this method of procurement for the design or construction of through-Delta conveyance facilities of the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 247, Sec. 1.   (SB 626)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2033, pursuant to Section 10112.10.)
-------------------------------------------

10112.3.

Construction Manager/General Contractor method projects shall progress as follows:

(a) (1) The department shall establish a procedure for the evaluation and selection of a construction manager through a request for qualifications (RFQ). The RFQ shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(A) If the construction manager is a partnership, limited partnership, or other association, a list of all of the partners, general partners, or association members known at the time of the statement of qualifications submission who will participate in the Construction Manager/General Contractor method contract.

(B) Evidence that the members of the construction manager have completed, or demonstrated the experience, competency, capability, and capacity to complete projects of similar size, scope, or complexity, and that proposed key personnel have sufficient experience and training to competently manage and complete the construction of the project, as well as a financial statement that assures the department that the construction manager has the capacity to complete the project, construction expertise, and an acceptable safety record.

(C) The licenses, registration, and credentials required to construct the project, including information on the revocation or suspension of any license, registration, or credential.

(D) Evidence
 that establishes that the construction manager has the capacity to obtain all required payment and performance bonding, liability insurance, and errors and omissions insurance.

(E) Any prior serious or willful violation of the California Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1973 (Part 1 (commencing with Section 6300) of Division 5 of the Labor Code), or the federal Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970 (Public Law 91-596), settled against any member of the construction manager, and information concerning workers’ compensation experience history and worker safety program.

(F) Information concerning any debarment, disqualification, or removal from a federal, state, or local government public works project. Any instance in which a construction manager, its owners, officers,
 or managing employees submitted a bid on a public works project and were found to be nonresponsive or were found by an awarding body not to be a responsible bidder.

(G) Any instance in which the construction manager, or its owners, officers, or managing employees, defaulted on a construction contract.

(H) Any violations of the Contractors’ State License Law (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code), excluding alleged violations of federal or state law including the payment of wages, benefits, apprenticeship requirements, or personal income tax withholding, or of the Federal Insurance Contributions Act (26 U.S.C. Sec. 3101, et seq.) withholding requirements settled against any member of the construction manager.

(I) Information concerning the bankruptcy or receivership of any member of the construction manager, including information concerning any work completed by a surety.

(J) Information concerning all settled adverse claims, disputes, or lawsuits between the owner of a public works project and any member of the construction manager during the five years preceding submission of a bid pursuant to this section, in which the claim, settlement, or judgment exceeds fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). Information shall also be provided concerning any work completed by a surety during this period.

(K) In the case of a partnership or other association that is not a legal entity, a copy of the agreement creating the partnership or association
 and specifying that all partners or association members agree to be fully liable for the performance under the contract.

(L) For the purposes of this paragraph, a construction manager’s safety record shall be deemed acceptable if their experience modification rate for the most recent three-year period is an average of 1.00 or less, and their average total recordable injury/illness rate and average lost work rate for the most recent three-year period does not exceed the applicable statistical standards for its business category.

(2) The information required pursuant to this subdivision shall be verified under oath by the construction manager and its members in the manner in which civil pleadings in civil actions are verified. Information that is not a public record pursuant to the
 California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) shall not be open to public inspection.

(b) For each RFQ, the department shall generate a final list of qualified persons or firms that participated in the RFQ prior to entering into negotiations on the contract or contracts to which the RFQ applies.

(c) (1) For each contract included in the RFQ, the department shall enter into separate negotiations for the contract with the highest qualified person or firm on the final list for that contract. However, if the RFQ is for multiple contracts and specifies that all of the multiple contracts will be awarded to a single construction manager, there may be a single negotiation for all of the multiple contracts.
 The negotiations shall include consideration of compensation and other contract terms that the department determines to be fair and reasonable to the department. In making this decision, the department shall take into account the estimated value, the scope, the complexity, and the nature of the professional services or construction services to be rendered. If the department is not able to negotiate a satisfactory contract with the highest qualified person or firm on the final list, regarding compensation and on other contract terms the department determines to be fair and reasonable, the department shall formally terminate negotiations with that person or firm. The department may undertake negotiations with the next most qualified person or firm on the final list in sequence until an agreement is reached, or a determination is made to reject all persons or firms on the final list.

(2) If a contract for construction services is entered into pursuant to this article and includes preconstruction services by the construction manager, the department shall enter into a written contract with the construction manager for preconstruction services under which contract the department shall pay the construction manager a fee for preconstruction services in an amount agreed upon by the department and the construction manager. The preconstruction services contract may include fees for services to be performed during the contract period provided, however, the department shall not request or obtain a fixed price or a guaranteed maximum price for the construction contract from the construction manager or enter into a construction contract with the construction manager until after the department has entered into a preconstruction
 services contract that shall provide for the subsequent negotiation for construction of all or any discreet phase or phases of the project.

(3) A contract for construction services shall be awarded after the plans have been sufficiently developed and either a fixed price or a guaranteed maximum price has been successfully negotiated. If a fixed price or a guaranteed maximum price is not negotiated, the department shall not award the contract for construction services.

(4) The department is not required to award the construction services contract.

(5) Construction shall not commence on any phase, package, or element until the department and construction manager agree in writing on either a fixed price that the department
 will pay for the construction to be commenced or a guaranteed maximum price for the construction to be commenced and construction schedule for the project. The construction manager shall perform not less than 30 percent of the work covered by the fixed price or guaranteed maximum price agreement reached. Work that is not performed directly by the construction manager shall be bid to subcontractors pursuant to Section 10112.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 129.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2033, pursuant to Section 10112.10.)
-------------------------------------------

10112.4.

(a) Any construction manager that is selected to construct a project pursuant to this article shall possess or obtain sufficient bonding to cover the contract amount for construction services and risk and liability insurance as the department may require.

(b) Any payment or performance bond written for the purposes of this article shall be written using a bond form developed by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 247, Sec. 1.   (SB 626)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2033, pursuant to Section 10112.10.)
-------------------------------------------

10112.5.

All subcontractors bidding on contracts pursuant to this article shall be afforded the protections contained in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1. The construction manager shall do all of the following:

(a) Provide public notice of the availability of work to be subcontracted in accordance with the publication requirements applicable to the competitive bidding process of the department.

(b) Provide a fixed date and time on which the subcontracted work will be awarded in accordance with the procedure established pursuant to this chapter.

(c) Comply with any subcontracting procedures adopted by the department that were included in the department’s RFQ. If the department has adopted procedures to prequalify public works contractors, the construction manager may use the procedures to prequalify subcontractors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 247, Sec. 1.   (SB 626)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2033, pursuant to Section 10112.10.)
-------------------------------------------

10112.6.

The department may retain the services of a design professional or construction project manager, or both, throughout the course of the project in order to ensure compliance with this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 247, Sec. 1.   (SB 626)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2033, pursuant to Section 10112.10.)
-------------------------------------------

10112.7.

A contract awarded pursuant to this article before it is repealed on January 1, 2033, shall continue in full force and effect until completion, including any subsequently executed changes to the contract, or termination.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 247, Sec. 1.   (SB 626)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2033, pursuant to Section 10112.10.)
-------------------------------------------

10112.8.

Nothing in this article is intended to affect, expand, alter, or limit any rights or remedies otherwise available at law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 247, Sec. 1.   (SB 626)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2033, pursuant to Section 10112.10.)
-------------------------------------------

10112.9.

(a) The department shall prepare and submit to the Legislature an interim report no later than July 1, 2025, that describes each Construction Manager/General Contractor project approved under this article beginning January 1, 2022, and that provides relevant data, including, but not limited to, cost, the stage of completion, and estimated time to completion.

(b) The department shall prepare and submit to the Legislature a final report, no later than July 1, 2028, that provides the relevant data referenced in subdivision (a) for projects that were approved under this article as of January 1, 2027.

(c) Both the interim and final reports shall provide a comprehensive assessment on the effectiveness of the Construction Manager/General Contractor project delivery method relative to project cost and time savings.

(d) A report to be submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 247, Sec. 1.   (SB 626)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2033, pursuant to Section 10112.10.)
-------------------------------------------

10112.10.

(a) The authority to perform water resources projects pursuant to this article is for no more than seven
 projects.

(b) This article shall remain in effect until January 1, 2033, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 247, Sec. 1.   (SB 626)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2033, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Article 1.1, commencing with Section 10112.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.3. Job Order Contracting Procurement Procedure for the Department of General Services [10113. - 10113.1.]

10113.

As used in this article:

(a) “Adjustment factor” means the job order contractor’s competitively bid adjustment to the department’s prices as published in the unit price catalog.

(b) “Department” means the Department of General Services or a successor state agency.

(c) “Director” means the Director of General Services or a designee.

(d) “Job order contract” means a competitively bid contract between the department and a responsible contractor in which the contractor agrees to a fixed period, fixed-unit price, and indefinite quantity contract that provides for job orders for
 public works.

(e) “Technical specifications” means information published by the department detailing the technical specifications with regard to quality of materials and workmanship to be used by the job order contractor in accomplishing the tasks listed in the unit price catalog.

(f) “Unit price” means the amount paid for a single unit of an item of work identified in the unit price catalog multiplied by the contractor’s adjustment factor.

(g) “Unit price catalog” means a compilation of specific construction tasks and the unit prices to install or demolish that construction. The listed tasks shall be based on generally accepted industry standards and information, where available, for various items of work to be performed by the job order contractor. The prices shall include the cost of materials, labor, and
 equipment for performing the items of work. The prices shall not include overhead and profit. All unit prices shall be developed using local prevailing wages.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 997, Sec. 19.   (AB 179)   Effective September 30, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10113.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the department may use an alternative procurement procedure for public works contracts, as defined in Section 1101, as provided in this article.

(b) The availability of job order contracting as a public works delivery method shall not preclude the use of other public works delivery methods.

(c) The department may solicit for job order contractors by region, by specific scopes of work, or both.

(d) Solicitations for job order contractors shall progress as follows:

(1) The department shall prepare a set of documents
 for job order contracts. The documents shall include a unit price catalog, job order contract terms, job order contract technical specifications, and any other information deemed necessary by the department.

(2) The department shall prepare a request for bids based on the documents prepared under paragraph (1) that invites job order contractors to submit sealed bids in a manner prescribed by the department.

(3) Each bidding job order contractor shall include in its bid one or more adjustment factors to the established unit prices provided in the request for bids based on the contract technical specifications.

(4) The department may award multiple job order contracts in response to a single job order contract solicitation as determined by the lowest combined adjustment factors as outlined in the invitation for
 bids.

(e) Any architect, engineer, consultant, or contractor retained by the department to assist in the development of the job order contract solicitation documents shall not be eligible to bid or to participate in the preparation of a job order contract bid related to that solicitation.

(f) Each job order executed under a job order contract shall provide an itemized list of each unit description required to complete the work with the unit’s associated unit price and the applied contractor’s adjustment factor.

(g) Job order contracts may be executed for an initial contract term of no more than 24 months.

(h) The maximum total dollar amount that may be awarded under a single job order contract shall not exceed ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in the
 first term of the job order contract. The department may issue up to four one-year extensions to each job order contract, up to an additional five million dollars ($5,000,000) per year.

(i) No single job order may exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000), not including change orders necessary to complete the scope of the original project.

(j) The maximum amounts specified for job order contract value and job order value shall be adjusted each January 1 to reflect the percentage change in the annual California Construction Index as used by the department. The amount shall be rounded off to the nearest one-thousand-dollar figure.

(k) The authority granted to the department by this article shall not be deemed to waive any provision of the Labor Code that would otherwise apply, including, but not limited to, prevailing
 wage rates determined by the Director of Industrial Relations.

(l) It is unlawful to split or separate job orders for the purpose of evading the cost limitation provisions of this section.

(m) (1) A contractor shall not be awarded a job order contract unless the contractor provides an enforceable commitment to the director that the contractor and its subcontractors at every tier will use a skilled and trained workforce to perform all work for each job order that falls within an apprenticeable occupation in the building and construction trades, in accordance with Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1.

(2) This subdivision shall not apply if any of the following requirements are met:

(A) The department has entered into
 a project labor agreement that will bind all contractors and subcontractors performing work on each job order to use a skilled and trained workforce, and the contractor agrees to be bound by that project labor agreement.

(B) The job order is being performed under the extension or renewal of a project labor agreement that was entered into by the department before January 1, 2024.

(C) The contractor has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind the contractor and all its subcontractors at every tier performing work for each job order to use a skilled and trained workforce.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “project labor agreement” has the same meaning as in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2500.

(n) (1) A
 job order contract shall set forth in the general conditions of the job order contract the party or parties responsible for seeing that the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 1770) of Chapter 1 of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code are complied with.

(2) For purposes of job order contracting, prevailing wages when required to be paid shall apply to all work ordered under the job order contract regardless of thresholds set forth in Section 1771.5 of the Labor Code.

(3) The job order contractor shall pay the prevailing wage in effect at the time the job order is issued by the department and all increases as published by the Department of Industrial Relations for the term of the job order contract, including all overtime, holiday, and shift provisions published by the Department of Industrial Relations.

(o) It is the intent of this legislation to streamline the delivery of public works. It is not the intent of the Legislature for job order contracting to displace work presently performed by state employees, nor to expand the types of public works performed by contractors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 997, Sec. 19.   (AB 179)   Effective September 30, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Minority and Women Business Participation Goals for State Contracts [10115. - 10115.15.]

10115.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The essence of the American economic system of private enterprise is free competition. Only through full and free competition can free markets, reasonable and just prices, free entry into business, and opportunities for the expression and growth of personal initiative and individual judgment be assured. The preservation and expansion of that competition is basic to the economic well-being of this state and that
 well-being cannot be realized unless the actual and potential capacity of minority, women, and disabled veteran business enterprises is encouraged and developed. Therefore, it is the declared policy of the state to aid the interests of minority, women, and disabled veteran business enterprises in order to preserve reasonable and just prices and a free competitive enterprise, to ensure that a fair proportion of the total number of contracts or subcontracts for commodities, supplies, technology, property, and services are awarded to minority, women, and disabled veteran business enterprises, and to maintain and strengthen the overall economy of the state.

(2) The opportunity for full participation in our free enterprise system by minority, women, and disabled veteran business enterprises is essential if this state is to attain social and economic equality for those businesses and improve the functioning of the state economy.

(3) State agencies which have established short- and long-range minority, women, and disabled veteran participation goals are awarding 23 percent or more of their contracts to these business enterprises.

(4) It is in the state’s interest to expeditiously improve the economically disadvantaged position of minority, women, and disabled veteran business enterprises.

(5) The economic position of these businesses can be improved by providing long-range substantial goals for procurement by state agencies of commodities, professional services, and construction work from minority, women, and disabled veteran businesses.

(6) Procurement by state agencies of goods and services from these businesses also benefits the state agencies and the citizens of the state by
 encouraging the expansion of the number of vendors for procurements, thereby encouraging competition among the vendors and promoting economic efficiency in the process.

(b) It is the purpose of this article to do all of the following:

(1) Encourage greater economic opportunity for minority, women, and disabled veteran business enterprises.

(2) Promote competition among state agencies in order to enhance long-term economic efficiency in the procurement of construction, commodities, and professional services contracts.

(3) Clarify and expand the program for the procurement by state agencies of commodities, professional services, and construction work from minority, women, and disabled veteran business enterprises.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, contracts awarded by any state agency, department, officer, or other state governmental entity for construction, professional services (except those subject to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 16850) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), materials, supplies, equipment, alteration, repair, or improvement shall have statewide participation goals of not less than 15 percent for minority business enterprises, not less than 5 percent for women business enterprises and 3 percent for disabled veteran business enterprises. These goals apply to the overall dollar amount expended each year by the awarding department, as defined by Section 10115.1, pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1330, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10115.1.

As used in this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Awarding department” means a state agency, department, governmental entity, or other officer or entity empowered by law to enter into contracts on behalf of the State of California.

(b) “Contract” includes an agreement or joint development agreement to provide labor, services, material, supplies, or equipment in the performance of a contract, franchise, concession, or lease granted, let, or awarded for and on behalf of the State of California.

(c) “Contractor” means a person or persons, regardless of race, color, sex, ethnic origin or ancestry, or any firm, partnership, corporation, or
 combination thereof, whether or not a minority or women business enterprise, who submits a bid and enters into a contract with a representative of a state agency, department, governmental entity, or other officer empowered by law to enter into contracts on behalf of the State of California.

(d) “Minority,” for purposes of this section, means a citizen or lawful permanent resident of the United States who is an ethnic person of color and who is: Black (a person having origins in any of the Black racial groups of Africa); Hispanic (a person of Mexican, Puerto Rican, Cuban, Central or South American, or other Spanish or Portuguese culture or origin regardless of race); Native American (an American Indian, Inuk, Aleut, or Native Hawaiian); Pacific-Asian (a person whose origins are from Japan, China, Taiwan, Korea, Vietnam, Laos, Cambodia, the Philippines, Samoa, Guam, or the United States Trust Territories of the Pacific, including the Northern
 Marianas); Asian-Indian (a person whose origins are from India, Pakistan, or Bangladesh); or any other group of natural persons identified as minorities in the respective project specifications of an awarding department or participating local agency.

(e) “Minority business enterprise” means a business concern that meets all of the following criteria:

(1) The business is an individual proprietorship, partnership, corporation, or joint venture at least 51 percent owned by one or more minorities or, in the case of any business whose stock is publicly held, at least 51 percent of the stock is owned by one or more minorities.

(2) A business whose management and daily operations are controlled by one or more minorities who own the business.

(3) A business
 concern with its home office located in the United States which is not a branch or subsidiary of a foreign corporation, firm, or other business.

(f) “Women business enterprise” means a business concern that meets all of the following criteria:

(1) The business is an individual proprietorship, partnership, corporation, or joint venture at least 51 percent owned by one or more women or, in the case of any business whose stock is publicly held, at least 51 percent of the stock is owned by one or more women.

(2) A business whose management and daily operations are controlled by one or more women who own the business.

(3) A business concern with its home office located in the United States which is not a branch or subsidiary of a foreign corporation, firm,
 or other business.

(g) “Goal” means a numerically expressed objective that awarding departments and contractors are required to make efforts to achieve.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 161.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10115.2.

In awarding contracts to the lowest responsible bidder, the awarding department shall consider the efforts of a bidder to meet minority business enterprise, women business enterprise, and disabled veteran business enterprise goals set forth in this article. The awarding department shall award the contract to the lowest responsible bidder meeting these goals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 19, Sec. 1.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10115.3.

(a) The awarding department shall establish a method of monitoring adherence to the goals specified in this article.

(b) The awarding department shall adopt rules and regulations for the purpose of implementing this article. Emergency regulations consistent with this section may be adopted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 61, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

10115.4.

In implementing this article, the awarding department shall utilize existing resources such as the Office of Small and Minority Business, the Minority Business Development Agency, and the Small Business Administration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 61, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

10115.6.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the failure of an awarding department to meet the goals established under this article shall not affect the validity or enforceability of any contract or any bonds, notes, or other obligations issued by the awarding department to provide for the payment of any contract subject to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 61, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

10115.7.

(a) Nothing in this article shall be construed to authorize any awarding department to discriminate in the awarding of any contract on the basis of ancestry or any characteristic listed or defined in Section 11135 of the Government Code.

(b) Nothing in this article shall be construed to authorize any contractor to discriminate in the solicitation or acceptance of bids for subcontracting, or for materials or equipment, on the basis of ancestry or any characteristic listed or
 defined in Section 11135 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 568, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

10115.8.

If any provision of this article or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the article which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this article are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1229, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

10115.9.

A limited liability company may be certified as a disabled veteran business enterprise pursuant to this article if the limited liability company is wholly owned by one or more disabled veterans.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 632, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10115.10.

(a) It shall be unlawful for a person or firm to:

(1) Knowingly and with intent to defraud, fraudulently obtain, retain, attempt to obtain or retain, or aid another in fraudulently obtaining or retaining or attempting to obtain or retain, acceptance or certification as a minority, women, or disabled veteran business enterprise, for the purposes of this article.

(2) Willfully and knowingly make a false statement
 with the intent to defraud, whether by affidavit, report, or other representation, to a state official or employee for the purpose of influencing the acceptance or certification or denial of acceptance or certification of any entity as a minority, women, or disabled veteran business enterprise.

(3) Willfully and knowingly obstruct, impede, or attempt to obstruct or impede, any state official or employee who is investigating the qualifications of a business entity which has requested acceptance or certification as a minority, women, or disabled veteran business enterprise.

(4) Knowingly and with intent to defraud, fraudulently obtain, attempt to obtain, or aid another person or firm in fraudulently obtaining or attempting to obtain, public moneys to which the person is not entitled under this article.

(5) Establish,
 or cooperate in the establishment of, or exercise control over, a firm found to have violated any of paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive. Any person or firm who violates this paragraph is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for the first violation, and a civil penalty not to exceed two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) for each additional, or subsequent violation. 

(6) This section shall not apply to minority and women business enterprise programs conducted by public utility companies pursuant to the California Public Utilities Commission’s General Order 156.

(b) Any person who violates paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a) is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for the first violation, and a civil penalty not to exceed
 twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for each additional or subsequent violation.

(c) Any person or firm that violates subdivision (a) shall, in addition to the penalties provided for in subdivision (b), be suspended from bidding on, or participating as either a contractor, subcontractor, or supplier in, any state contract or project for a period of not less than 30 days nor more than one year. However, for an additional or subsequent violation the period of suspension shall be extended for a period of up to three years. Any person or firm that fails to satisfy the penalties imposed pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c) shall be prohibited from further contracting with the state until the penalties are satisfied.

(d) The awarding department shall report all alleged violations of this section to the Office of Small and Minority Business. The office shall subsequently report all alleged
 violations to the Attorney General who shall determine whether to bring a civil action against any person or firm for violation of this section.

(e) The office shall monitor the status of all reported violations and shall maintain and make available to all state departments a central listing of all firms and persons who have been determined to have committed violations resulting in suspension.

(f) No awarding department shall enter into any contract with any person or firm suspended for violating this section during the period of the person’s or firm’s suspension. No awarding department shall award a contract to any contractor utilizing the services of any person or firm as a subcontractor suspended for violating this section during the period of the person’s or firm’s suspension.

(g) The awarding department shall
 check the central listing provided by the office to verify that the person, firm, or contractor to whom the contract is being awarded, or any person or firm being utilized as a subcontractor by that person, firm, or contractor, is not under suspension for violating this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1032, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

10115.11.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, statewide participation goals for contracts let by the Department of Corrections shall be exclusive of inmate day labor contracts.

(b) The goals established in this article shall also apply to the overall dollar amount expended each year on contracts let by the California Department of Corrections for the purposes of services, maintenance, and supplies excluding contracts for services for inmate medical
 needs.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 10108.6 by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1330, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10115.12.

(a) Any awarding department taking bids in connection with the award of any contract shall provide in the general conditions under which bids will be received, that any person making a bid or offer to perform a contract shall, in his or her bid or offer, set forth the following information:

(1) The name and the location of the place of business of each subcontractor certified as a minority, women, or disabled veteran business enterprise who will perform work or labor or render
 service to the prime contractor in connection with the performance of the contract and who will be used by the prime contractor to fulfill minority, women, and disabled veteran business enterprise participation goals.

(2) The portion of work that will be done by each subcontractor under paragraph (1). Except in cases of emergency where a contract is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health, welfare, or safety, or protection of state property, the prime contractor shall list only one subcontractor for each portion of work as is defined by the prime contractor in his or her bid or offer.

(b) The Subletting and Subcontracting Fair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1 shall apply to the information required by subdivision (a) relating to subcontractors certified as minority, women, or disabled veteran business enterprises.

(c) For purposes of this section, “subcontractor” and “prime contractor” shall have the same meaning as those terms are defined in Section 4113.

(d) As used in this section, “contract” does not include a contract negotiated pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 4525) of Division 5 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1032, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

10115.13.
